Hawaii statutes.
[§445-134.11] Pawn transaction agreement;
disclosure requirements. (a) All pawn transaction agreements shall be in
writing.

(b) The pawnbroker shall provide the customer
with a signed copy of the pawn transaction agreement.

(c) The pawn transaction agreement shall
include:

(1) The name, address, and telephone number of the
pawnbroker;

(2) The name, address, telephone number, and date of
birth of the customer;

(3) The type of identification presented by the
customer;

(4) The pawn transaction number;

(5) The date on which the pawn transaction agreement
is signed;

(6) The net amount paid to, received by, or paid or
payable for the account of the customer, expressed as the "amount
financed";

(7) The dollar amount of the pawn finance charge,
expressed as the "finance charge";

(8) The rate of the pawn finance charge as applied to
the amount financed, expressed as the "annual percentage rate";

(9) The total amount that must be paid to redeem the
pledged goods on or before the maturity date, expressed as the "total of
payments";

(10) An identification of pledged goods, including all
serial numbers and model numbers, where available, and any other identifying
markings or information;

(11) The maturity date of the pawn transaction;

(12) A statement to the effect that the customer is
not obligated to redeem the pledged goods, and the pledged goods shall be
forfeited to the pawnbroker upon the expiration of the last holding period,
provided that the pledged goods may be redeemed by the customer within the
holding period by making payment of the originally agreed total of payments
plus an additional pawn finance charge in accordance with section 445-134.12;
and

(13) The date on which the holding period expires. [L
1992, c 192, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next